scalatestsuite/src/main/resources/search-engine/hyph/la.xml
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="ISO-8859-1"?>
<!DOCTYPE hyphenation-info SYSTEM "hyphenation.dtd">

<!-- Created by Stéphane Bline - Peregrine Systems - sbline@apsydev.com
     Conversion of the original TEX italian hyphenation patterns written by 
     Claudio Beccari (beccari@polito.it).
     Use of the original work granted by the author.
     Modified by Pierre François for latin hyphenation by adding classes
     for latin with accents
     (pf@romanliturgy.org)
-->
<hyphenation-info>

<hyphen-char value="-"/>
<hyphen-min before="2" after="2"/>

<classes>
'
aA
bB
cC
dD
eE
fF
gG
hH
iI
jJ
kK
lL
mM
nN
oO
pP
qQ
rR
sS
tT
uU
vV
wW
xX
yY
zZ
æÆ
àÀ
áÁ
âÂ
çÇ
èÈ
éÉ
êÊ
íÍ
îÎ
ïÏ
óÓ
ôÔ
úÚ
ûÛ
ýÝ
</classes>
<patterns>
.a3p2n
.anti1  .anti3m2n
.bio1
.ca4p3s
.circu2m1
.di2s3cine
.e2x
.fran2k3
.free3
.narco1
.opto1
.orto3p2
.para1
.poli3p2
.pre1
.p2s
.sha2re3
.tran2s3c .tran2s3d .tran2s3f .tran2s3l .tran2s3n .tran2s3p .tran2s3r .tran2s3t
.su2b3lu   .su2b3r
.wa2g3n
.wel2t1
a1ia a1ie  a1io  a1iu a1uo a1ya 2at.
e1iu e2w  
o1ia o1ie  o1io  o1iu
'2
1b   2bb   2bc   2bd  2bf  2bm  2bn  2bp  2bs  2bt  2bv
     b2l   b2r   2b.  2b'. 2b''
1c   2cb   2cc   2cd  2cf  2ck  2cm  2cn  2cq  2cs  2ct  2cz
     2chh  c2h   2chb ch2r 2chn c2l  c2r  2c.  2c'. 2c'' .c2
1d   2db   2dd   2dg  2dl  2dm  2dn  2dp  d2r  2ds  2dt  2dv  2dw
     2d.   2d'.  2d'' .d2
1f   2fb   2fg   2ff  2fn  f2l  f2r  2fs  2ft  2f.  2f'. 2f''
1g   2gb   2gd   2gf  2gg  g2h  g2l  2gm  g2n  2gp  g2r  2gs  2gt
     2gv   2gw   2gz  2gh2t     2g.  2g'. 2g''
1h   2hb   2hd   2hh  hi3p2n    h2l  2hm  2hn  2hr  2hv  2h.  2h'.  2h''
1j   2j.   2j'.  2j''
1k   2kg   2kf   k2h  2kk  k2l  2km  k2r  2ks  2kt  2k.  2k'. 2k''
1l   2lb   2lc   2ld  2l3f2     2lg  l2h  2lk  2ll  2lm  2ln  2lp
     2lq   2lr   2ls  2lt  2lv  2lw  2lz  2l.  2l'. 2l''
1m   2mb   2mc   2mf  2ml  2mm  2mn  2mp  2mq  2mr  2ms  2mt  2mv  2mw
     2m.   2m'.  2m''
1n   2nb   2nc   2nd  2nf  2ng  2nk  2nl  2nm  2nn  2np  2nq  2nr
     2ns   2nt   2nv  2nz  n2g3n     2nheit.   2n.  2n'  2n''
1p   2pd   p2h   p2l  2pn  3p2ne 2pp p2r  2ps  3p2sic 2pt  2pz  2p.  2p'. 2p''
1q   2qq   2q.   2q'. 2q''
1r   2rb   2rc   2rd  2rf  r2h  2rg  2rk  2rl  2rm  2rn  2rp
     2rq   2rr   2rs  2rt  rt2s3 2rv 2rx  2rw  2rz  2r.  2r'. 2r''
1s2  2shm  2s3s  s4s3m 2s3p2n   2stb 2stc 2std 2stf 2stg 2stm 2stn
     2stp  2sts  2stt 2stv 2sz  4s.  4s'. 4s''
1t   2tb   2tc   2td  2tf  2tg  t2h  t2l  2tm  2tn  2tp  t2r  2ts
     3t2sch      2tt  2tv  2tw  t2z  2tzk 2tzs 2t.  2t'. 2t''
1v   2vc   v2l   v2r  2vv  2v.  2v'. 2v''
1w   w2h   wa2r  2w1y 2w.  2w'. 2w''
1x   2xw   2x.   2x'. 2x''
y1ou y1i
1z   2zb   2zd   2zl  2zn  2zp  2zt  2zs  2zv  2zz  2z.  2z'. 2z''  .z2
</patterns>
</hyphenation-info>
